Utah statutes.
10-7-82.   Development committee -- Functions.
It shall be the function of the city resource development committee to assist
in the development of the city's mineral, water, manpower, industrial and
other resources, and to make such recommendations to the board of city
commissioners or council for resource development programs as it may deem
advisable.
